Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1039
Nail technology school, defined.

Nail technology school means a fixed structure or part thereof licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to serve as the site for teaching the practices of nail technology to nail technology students.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.06;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 301.